District of Columbia statutes.
38-756.01

Rules.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§  2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

Each local education agency may advise the Mayor with respect to all proposed matters or rules issued pursuant to this chapter.

June 19, 2012, D.C. Law 19-142, § 601, 59 DCR 3642

History